Louisiana, session 2026, HB86.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 3-H of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 15:564 through 564.3, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 3-H. DOMESTIC ABUSE REPEAT OFFENDER REGISTRY
§564. Registration of persons convicted of domestic abuse offenses
A. Any person residing in this state who has been convicted of the
commission or conspiracy to commit, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to the
commission or conspiracy to commit, a second or subsequent violation of any of the
following shall register and provide notification in accordance with the provisions
of this Chapter:
(1) R.S. 14:34.9 (Battery of a dating partner)
(2) R.S. 14:34.9.1 (Aggravated assault upon a dating partner)
(3) R.S. 14:35.3 (Domestic abuse battery)
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-123 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 86
(4) R.S. 14:37.7 (Domestic abuse aggravated assault)
(5) R.S. 14:40.2 (Stalking)
(6) R.S. 14:40.3 (Cyberstalking)
(7) R.S. 14:79 (Violation of protective orders)
B.(1) The court shall provide written notification to any person who commits
a second or subsequent violation of any offense listed in Subsection A of this Section
and the offender shall register on the Domestic Abuse Repeat Offender Registry
upon release, or as a condition of his probation or parole.
(2) An offender who is required to register pursuant to this Section shall
register in person with the sheriff of the parish of the person's residence, or
residences, if there is more than one, and with the chief of police if the address of
any of the person's residences is located in an incorporated area which has a police
department. If the offender resides in a municipality with a population in excess of
three hundred thousand persons, the offender shall register in person with the police
department of his municipality of residence.
C.(1) No later than five business days after release, an offender who is
required to register shall register and provide all of the following information to the
appropriate law enforcement agencies listed in Subsection B of this Section:
(a) Name and any aliases used by the offender.
(b) The offender's physical address or addresses of residence.
(c) Name and physical address of the offender's place of employment. If the
offender does not have a fixed place of employment, the offender shall provide
information with as much specificity as possible regarding the places where he
works, including but not limited to travel routes used by the offender.
(d) Name and physical address of the school in which he is a student.
(e) Two forms of proof of residence for each residential address provided,
including but not limited to a driver's license, bill for utility service, and bill for
telephone service. If those forms of proof of residence are not available, the offender
may provide an affidavit of an adult resident living at the same address. The
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-123 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 86
affidavit shall certify that the affiant understands his obligation to provide written
notice in the same manner as provided in R.S. 15:542.1.4(B) to the appropriate law
enforcement agency with whom the offender last registered when the offender no
longer resides at the residence provided in the affidavit.
(f) The crime for which the offender was convicted and the date and place
of such conviction, and if known by the offender, the court in which the conviction
was obtained, the docket number of the case, the specific statute under which he was
convicted, and the sentence imposed.
(g) A current photograph of the offender.
(h) The offender's telephone numbers, including fixed location phone and
mobile phone numbers assigned to the offender or associated with any residence
address of the offender.
(i) A description of every motorized vehicle registered to or operated by the
offender, including license plate number and vehicle identification number, and a
copy of the offender's driver's license or identification card. This information shall
be provided prior to the offender's operation of the vehicle.
(j) The offender's social security number and date of birth.
(k) A description of the physical characteristics of the offender, including but
not limited to sex, race, hair color, eye color, height, age, weight, scars, tattoos, or
other identifying marks on the body of the offender.
(l) Every email address of the offender.
(2)(a)(i) Failure to register as required in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection
constitutes a violation of this Chapter.
(ii) Knowingly providing false information to any law enforcement officer,
office, or agency required to receive registration information pursuant to the
provisions of this Chapter constitutes a failure to register.
(b) Upon conviction, the offender shall be fined not more than one thousand
dollars and imprisoned for not more than one year with or without hard labor.
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-123 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 86
D.(1) The offender shall pay to the appropriate law enforcement agencies
with whom he is required to register, except for the campus law enforcement agency
of an institution of postsecondary education, an annual registration fee of two
hundred fifty dollars to be allocated as follows:
(a) One hundred fifty dollars to defray the costs of maintaining the record of
the offender.
(b) One hundred dollars to the governor's office on women's policy for
domestic abuse intervention programming and services.
(2) The payment of the fee shall be made in accordance with any rule
regarding indigency adopted by the judges of the judicial district court in the
jurisdiction or as determined by criteria established by the Department of Public
Safety and Corrections. The offender shall pay the fee upon his initial registration
and on each subsequent anniversary of his initial registration.
(3) Failure by the offender to pay the annual registration fee constitutes a
failure to register and subjects the offender to prosecution under the provisions of
this Chapter. The offender shall not be prevented from registering in accordance
with this Section due to failure to pay the annual registration fee.
E. Upon receipt of the registration information as required by the provisions
of this Section, the law enforcement agency shall, by electronic means, immediately
forward the offender's information to the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification
and Information.
F. The offender registration and notification requirements required by this
Chapter are mandatory and shall not be waived or suspended by any court. Any
order waiving or suspending offender registration and notification requirements shall
be null, void, and of no effect. Any order waiving or suspending registration and
notification requirements shall not be construed to invalidate an otherwise valid
conviction, unless by joint written motion of the district attorney and the offender.
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-123 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 86
§564.1. Duties of the Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information
A.(1) The Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information shall
develop and maintain the central registry known as the Domestic Abuse Repeat
Offender Registry. The registry shall contain the information transmitted to the
bureau pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter. Upon receipt of the registration
and information of any person subject to the provisions of this Chapter, the bureau
shall immediately enter the appropriate information in the public registry. The
bureau shall accept electronically submitted information and registration renewal
information that is received from law enforcement.
(2)(a) The bureau shall provide for public access to the information
contained in the registry, including internet-based access, which shall have field-
search capabilities.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph,
the following information is exempt from public access:
(i) Social security numbers.
(ii) Names of the victims or survivors of the offenses requiring registration.
(iii) Telephone numbers, subject to the provisions of Subparagraphs (c) and
(d) of this Paragraph.
(iv) Email addresses.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph,
the registry shall contain the ability to search by telephone numbers, email addresses,
online screen names, or other online identities to provide information to the person
conducting the search regarding whether or not that information has been linked to
a person convicted of an offense that requires registration pursuant to R.S.
15:564(A). This search shall not disclose the name or any other identifying
information about the offender to the person conducting the search, except to identify
that the information has been linked to a person convicted of an offense that requires
registration pursuant to R.S. 15:564(A).
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-123 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 86
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraphs (b) and (c) of this
Paragraph, the bureau shall, upon request by any person or entity in a manner
prescribed by the bureau, provide a list of telephone numbers, email addresses,
online screen names, static internet protocol addresses, or other online identities of
persons in the Domestic Abuse Repeat Offender Registry for the purpose of
identifying and monitoring a registered user associated with the telephone number,
email address, online screen name, static internet protocol address, or other online
identity. The information provided to the person or entity shall not disclose the name
or other identifying information of the offender that is associated with, or who is
using, any of the telephone numbers, email addresses, online screen names, static
internet protocol addresses, or other online identities in the provided list.
(e) The bureau shall maintain a Domestic Abuse Repeat Offender
Notification and Registration website on the internet, which shall contain a
disclaimer informing the public of all of the following:
(i) The information contained on the site is obtained from offenders, and the
bureau does not guarantee its accuracy or completeness.
(ii) Members of the public are not allowed to use the information to harass
or threaten offenders or members of their families.
(iii) Harassment, stalking, or threats against offenders or their families shall
be a violation of Louisiana criminal laws.
B. The bureau shall develop and maintain the registry as to provide for
automatic email notifications at the time when an offender begins residence,
employment, or school attendance within a certain geographic radius or zip code.
This function of the registry shall allow members of the public and organizations to
request automatic email notifications to be sent to an email address provided by the
requestor for a certain geographic radius or zip code specified by the requestor.
C. The bureau is hereby designated as the state agency to receive information
regarding an out-of-state person who establishes a residence in this state pursuant to
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-123 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 86
R.S. 15:542.1.3 and has been convicted of a similar offense as those that require
registration pursuant to R.S. 15:564(A).
D. The bureau may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Chapter.
E.(1) The bureau shall provide for the capability for a social networking
website to compare the database of registered users of that social networking website
to the list of email addresses, instant message addresses, and other similar online
identifiers of persons in the Domestic Abuse Repeat Offender Registry.
(2) An entity operating a social networking website that uses the website to
compare its database of registered users to the list of email addresses, instant
message addresses, and other online identifiers of persons in the registry shall first
provide the bureau with all of the following information:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the entity operating the
social networking website.
(b) The legal nature and corporate status of the entity operating the social
networking website.
(c) A statement signed by the chief legal officer of the social networking
website to the effect that the information obtained from the registry shall not be
disclosed for any purpose other than for comparing the database of registered users
of the social networking website against the list of email addresses, instant message
addresses, and other online identifiers of persons contained in the state registry to
protect victims and survivors from abuse or neglect, and that disclosure of this
information for any other purpose is unlawful.
(d) The name, address, and telephone number of a natural person who is
authorized to receive service of process for the entity operating the social networking
website.
(3) After complying with the requirements of Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection, the entity operating the social networking website may screen users or
compare its database of registered users to the list of email addresses, instant
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-123 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 86
message addresses, and other online identifiers of persons contained in the Domestic
Abuse Repeat Offender Registry as frequently as the bureau will allow for the
purpose of identifying, monitoring, or removing a registered user associated with
email addresses, instant message addresses, and other online identifiers contained in
the registry.
(4) An entity operating a social networking website which complies with the
provisions of Paragraphs (2) and (3) of this Subsection and its directors, officers,
employees, or agents may claim such compliance as a defense to a claim for liability
arising against the entity or those persons.
§564.2. Duration of registration and notification period
A person required to register pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter shall
comply with the requirement to keep current his registration information for one year
from the date of initial registration in this state, five years if he is required to register
for a second time, and for the duration of the lifetime of the offender if he is required
to register for a third or subsequent time, unless the underlying conviction is
reversed, set aside, or vacated.
§564.3. Short title
This Chapter shall be referred to and may be cited as "The Purple Promise
Law".